Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.090

Administration of chapter—Construction—Severability.

(1) The retirement plan created by this chapter shall be administered so as to comply with the federal Internal Revenue Code, Title 26 U.S.C., and specifically with plan qualification requirements imposed on governmental plans by section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Any section or provision of this chapter which may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to satisfy requirements imposed by section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) If any section or provision of this chapter is found to be in conflict with the plan qualification requirements for governmental plans in section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the conflicting part of this chapter is hereby inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and such finding shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter.

[ 1995 c 239 s 209.]

NOTES:

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.